lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Techninės įrangos priedai > Įrankių saugojimas ir tvarkymas > Įrankių dėžės: Rankoje nešiojamos įrankių dėžės; Įrankių dėžės ant ratukų; Įrankių dėžės sunkvežimiams
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferragens > Porta-ferramentas > Caixas de ferramentas: Caixas de ferramentas para transporte manual; Caixas de ferramentas com rodas; Caixas de ferramentas para caminhões
en: Hardware > Hardware Accessories > Tool Storage & Organization > Tool Boxes: Hand Carry Tool Boxes; Rolling Tool Boxes; Truck Tool Boxes
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для оборудования и технических изделий > Хранение инструментов > Ящики для инструментов: Ящики для инструментов с ручкой для переноски; Ящики для инструментов на колесах; Ящики для инструментов для кузова пикапа
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do sprzętu > Przechowywanie i porządkowanie narzędzi > Skrzynki narzędziowe: Przenośne skrzynki narzędziowe; Skrzynki narzędziowe na kółkach; Skrzynki narzędziowe do pickupa
sv: Metallprodukter > Tillbehör till järnvaror > Förvaring och organisering av verktyg > Verktygslådor: Handburna verktygslådor; Rullbara verktygslådor; Lastbilsverktygslådor
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 五金配件 > 工具存储与收纳 > 工具箱: 手提工具箱; 滚轮工具箱; 卡车工具箱
sk-SK: Náradie > Príslušenstvo ku kovaniu > Uskladnenie a organizácia nástrojov > Boxy na náradie: Prenosné boxy na náradie; Pojazdné boxy na náradie; Boxy na náradie na nákladné autá
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii de feronerie > Depozitarea și organizarea sculelor > Cutii de scule: Cutii de scule pentru transport manual; Cutii de scule pe rotile; Cutii de scule pentru camioane
da: Isenkram > Isenkram – tilbehør > Værktøjsopbevaring og -organisering > Værktøjskasser: Håndbærende værktøjskasser; Rullende værktøjskasser; Værktøjskasser til lastbiler
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori ferramenta > Conservazione/ordine attrezzi > Cassette degli attrezzi: Cassette degli attrezzi per il trasporto a mano; Cassette degli attrezzi con ruote; Cassette degli attrezzi per camion
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de equipamento > Armazenamento e organização de ferramentas > Caixas de ferramentas: Caixas de ferramentas para transporte manual; Caixas de ferramentas rolantes; Caixas de ferramentas para camiões
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện phần cứng > Cất giữ và sắp xếp dụng cụ > Hộp dụng cụ: Hộp dụng cụ cầm tay; Hộp dụng cụ có bánh xe; Hộp dụng cụ xe tải
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ υλικού > Αποθήκευση & οργάνωση εργαλείων > Κουτιά εργαλείων: Φορητά κουτιά εργαλείων; Κυλιόμενα κιβώτια εργαλείων; Κιβώτια εργαλείων φορτηγών
hu: Hardver > Hardverkiegészítők > Szerszámtároló és -szervező > Szerszámosdobozok: Kézi szerszámosdobozok; Guruló szerszámosdobozok; Teherautós szerszámosdobozok
fi: Rakentaminen > Tarvikkeet > Työkalujen säilytys > Työkalulaatikot: Työkalulaatikot, käsin kannettavat; Vedettävät työkalulaatikot; Työkalulaatikot autoon
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios de bricolaje > Organización y almacenamiento de herramientas > Cajas de herramientas: Cajas de herramientas para llevar a mano; Cajas de herramientas con ruedas; Cajas de herramientas para camiones
zh-TW: 硬體 > 硬體配件 > 工具收納 > 工具箱: 手持工具箱; 滾輪工具箱; 卡車工具箱
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์ฮาร์ดแวร์ > การจัดเก็บและการจัดระเบียบเครื่องมือ > กล่องเครื่องมือ: กล่องเครื่องมือพกพา; กล่องเครื่องมือติดล้อ; กล่องเครื่องมือติดรถ
nb: Maskinvare > Tilbehør til materiell > Oppbevaring og organisering av verktøy > Verktøykasser: Håndverktøykasser; Rullende verktøykasser; Verktøykasser for lastebil
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Bouwbeslag > Gereedschapopslag en -indeling > Gereedschapskisten: Draagbare gereedschapskisten; Rollende gereedschapskisten; Gereedschapskisten voor vrachtwagens
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires de quincaillerie > Organisation et rangement d’outils > Boîtes à outils: Boîtes à outils à main; Boîtes à outils roulantes; Coffres à outils
tr: Hırdavat > Tesisat Aksesuarları > Alet Saklama ve Düzenleme > Takım Çantaları: El Taşıma Takım Çantaları; Haddeleme Takım Çantaları; Kamyon Takım Çantaları
hr-HR: Željezarija > Metalni dodaci > Skladištenje i organizacija alata > Kutije za alat: Ručne kutije za alat; Kutije za alat s kotačima; Kutije za alat za kamion
ja: DIY用品 > DIY小物類 > 工具保管用品 > 工具箱: ハンドキャリー工具箱; ローリング工具箱; トラック工具箱
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Bauzubehör > Werkzeugaufbewahrung & Ordnungssysteme > Werkzeugkästen: Tragbare Werkzeugkästen; Werkzeugkästen auf Rädern; LKW-Werkzeugkästen
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Kutilství a řemeslo – příslušenství > Ukládání a organizace nářadí > Boxy na nářadí: Příruční boxy na nářadí; Boxy na nářadí na kolečkách; Boxy na nářadí do auta
ko: 철물 > 철물 부대용품 > 공구 수납/정리 > 공구 상자: 휴대용 공구 상자; 바퀴식 공구 상자; 트럭용 공구 상자
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za gradbeno opremo > Shranjevanje in organizacija orodja > Škatle za orodje: Škatle za orodje za prenašanje; Škatle za orodje na kolesih; Škatle za orodje za tovornjake
bg-BG: Железария > Обков и аксесоари > Съхранение и организация на инструменти > Кутии за инструменти: Ръчни кутии за инструменти; Кутии за инструменти на колела; Кутии за инструменти за камиони